apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
<pardef n="dr/epe__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>epi</l>   <r>epe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epen</l>  <r>epe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epe</l>   <r>epe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>epi</l>   <r>epe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epne</l>  <r>epe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epne</l>  <r>epe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epande</l><r>epe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ep</l>    <r>epe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>epa</l>   <r>epe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epe</l>   <r>epe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epast</l> <r>epe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epe</l>   <r>epe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>epi</l>   <r>epe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ep</l>    <r>epe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ap</l>    <r>epe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="h/evje__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ovi</l>   <r>evje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evja</l>  <r>evje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oven</l>  <r>evje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evja</l>  <r>evje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ove</l>   <r>evje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ovi</l>   <r>evje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evja</l>  <r>evje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ovne</l>  <r>evje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evja</l>  <r>evje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ovne</l>  <r>evje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evjande</l><r>evje<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>evja</l>  <r>evje<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evje</l>  <r>evje<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evj</l>   <r>evje<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ev</l>    <r>evje<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evja</l>  <r>evje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evje</l>  <r>evje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evjast</l><r>evje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evja</l>  <r>evje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ove</l>   <r>evje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ovi</l>   <r>evje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evjar</l> <r>evje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ev</l>    <r>evje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evja</l>  <r>evje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ov</l>    <r>evje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="yl/le__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lande</l> <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>l</l>     <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>la</l>    <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>    <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>last</l>  <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>   <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="skr/økke__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>okki</l>  <r>økke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okken</l> <r>økke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okke</l>  <r>økke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>okki</l>  <r>økke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okne</l>  <r>økke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okne</l>  <r>økke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>økkande</l><r>økke<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>økk</l>   <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>økka</l>  <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>økke</l>  <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>økkast</l><r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okke</l>  <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>okki</l>  <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>økk</l>   <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okk</l>   <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="helle">           <i>hel</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="framstelle">  <i>framstel</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bestille">    <i>bestil</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tilfredsstille"><i>tilfredsstil</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skolle">      <i>skol</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forgylle">    <i>forgyl</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="stille">          <i>stil</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="sidestille">          <i>sidestil</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="drepe">           <i>dr</i><par n="dr/epe__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="avbestille"><i>avbestil</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="blottstille"><i>blottstil</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="botnfelle"><i>botnfel</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="domfelle"><i>domfel</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="etterfylle"><i>etterfyl</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="felle"><i>fel</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="finstille"><i>finstil</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forspille"><i>forspil</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="framstille"><i>framstil</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gylle"><i>gyl</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="innbille"><i>innbil</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="innstille"><i>innstil</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jamstille"><i>jamstil</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="likestille"><i>likestil</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nedfelle"><i>nedfel</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="omstille"><i>omstil</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="oppfylle"><i>oppfyl</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pantstille"><i>pantstil</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rotfylle"><i>rotfyl</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="stelle"><i>stel</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="trollstille"><i>trollstil</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="utfylle"><i>utfyl</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vanstelle"><i>vanstel</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="æreskjelle"><i>æreskjel</i><par n="yl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
